District of Columbia statutes.
11-906

Administration by chief judge; discharge of duties.

(a)

The chief judge shall administer and superintend the business of the Superior Court, as provided in Chapter 17 of this title. The chief judge shall attend to the discharge of the duties pertaining to the office of chief judge and perform such additional judicial work as the chief judge is able to perform.

(b)

The chief judge shall, insofar as is consistent with this title, arrange and divide the business of the Superior Court and fix the time of sessions of the Family Court and the various divisions and branches of the Superior Court.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 483, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, §§ 1(b)(10), (11), 108 Stat. 713
Jan. 8, 2002, 115 Stat. 2100, Pub. L. 107-114, § 2(b)

History

1981 Ed., § 11-906.
1973 Ed., § 11-906.

Prior Codifications

Pub. L. 107-114, in subsec. (b), inserted “the Family Court and” before “the various divisions”.

Effect of Amendments